Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2628
Insurance consultant's license; fee.

A person holding a license issued under sections 44-2606 to 44-2635 shall pay to the department the required license fee as prescribed by section 44-2621. The department shall not issue a license to any person who fails to pay the required license fee when it becomes due except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of section 44-2627.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 23;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 212;

Laws 1999, LB 260, § 3.